Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.150

Certificates of deposit.

A mutual savings bank may issue savings certificates of deposit in such form and upon such terms as the bank may determine.

[ 1981 c 86 s 3; 1979 c 51 s 1; 1975 c 15 s 1; 1969 c 55 s 1; 1959 c 41 s 1; 1959 c 14 s 1; 1957 c 80 s 3; 1955 c 13 s 32.08.150. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 13; RRS s 3342.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 86: See note following RCW 32.08.140.